District of Columbia statutes.
1-1310

Scale of plats.

The plats and squares and subdivisions of the City of Washington shall be drawn upon a uniform scale of not less than 1 inch to 50 feet, and shall show the lines of all subdivisions of the squares as the same existed at the date of the completion of each square.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1425, ch. 854, § 1580
1981 Ed., § 1-910.
1973 Ed., § 1-610.